Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.331

Nuisances.

Every act or thing done or being within the limits of a second-class city which is declared by law or by ordinance to be a nuisance shall be a nuisance and shall be so considered in all actions and proceedings. All remedies given by law for the prevention and abatement of nuisances shall apply thereto.

[ 1994 c 81 s 46; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.330. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 21; 1890 p 187 s 123; RRS s 9135. Formerly RCW 35.24.330.]

NOTES:

Public nuisances: Chapter 9.66 RCW.